Wisconsin, session 2025, AB418.
do enact as follows:AB418,11Section 1. 50.083 of the statutes is created to read:AB418,2,3250.083 Visitation by essential visitor or clergy during a 3communicable disease outbreak. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB418,3,24(a) “Assisted living facility” means a community-based residential facility, as 1defined in s. 50.01 (1g), a residential care apartment complex, as defined in s. 50.01 2(6d), or an adult family home, as defined in s. 50.01 (1) (b).AB418,3,33(b) “Essential visitor” means any of the following:AB418,3,641. An individual to visit and provide support to a resident in an assisted living 5facility or nursing home who is designated by the resident or the resident’s 6guardian or agent under an activated power of attorney for health care.AB418,3,972. The guardian of an assisted living facility or nursing home resident or the 8agent under an activated power of attorney for health care for an assisted living 9facility or nursing home resident.AB418,3,1010(c) “Member of the clergy” has the meaning given in s. 765.002 (1).AB418,3,1111(d) “Nursing home” has the meaning given in s. 50.01 (3).AB418,3,1612(2) Applicability. At any time an assisted living facility or a nursing home 13limits visitors due to an outbreak or epidemic of a communicable disease in the 14community in which the assisted living facility or nursing home is located, the 15assisted living facility or nursing home shall conform its visitation policy to this 16section.AB418,3,2317(3) Assisted living facility and nursing home visitation during a 18communicable disease outbreak. (a) 1. Subject to pars. (b) and (c), each assisted 19living facility and nursing home shall allow at least one essential visitor, who 20agrees to comply with any public health policies and infection prevention and 21control protocols of the assisted living facility or nursing home, to enter the assisted 22living facility or nursing home to visit a resident in compassionate care situations, 23including any of the following:AB418,4,31a. The resident has recently been admitted to the assisted living facility or 2nursing home and is experiencing difficulty in adjusting to the change in 3environment and lack of family presence.AB418,4,44b. The resident is grieving the recent death of a friend or family member.AB418,4,55c. The resident is nearing end of life.AB418,4,96d. In the judgment of the attending health care professional, as defined in s. 7154.01 (1r), the benefits of the presence of the essential visitor outweighs the 8potential negative impacts that the essential visitor’s presence might have on other 9patients, visitors, and staff in the assisted living facility or nursing home.AB418,4,12102. Subject to par. (b), each assisted living facility and nursing home shall allow 11at least one member of the clergy to visit with a resident of the assisted living 12facility or nursing home.AB418,4,1413(b) An assisted living facility or a nursing home may deny visitation with a 14resident to a member of the clergy or essential visitor if any of the following applies:AB418,4,18151. The member of the clergy or essential visitor refuses to comply with any 16policies of the assisted living facility or nursing home that are in place to protect the 17health and safety of the member of the clergy or essential visitor, other visitors, 18residents, and staff in the assisted living facility or nursing home.AB418,4,22192. It is unknown if the member of the clergy or essential visitor is contagious 20with a communicable disease that poses a substantial risk to others and adequate 21precautions are not available to reasonably prevent the member of the clergy or 22essential visitor from infecting others at the assisted living facility or nursing home.AB418,5,3233. The resident is known or suspected to be contagious with a communicable 1disease that poses a substantial risk to others and adequate precautions are not 2available to reasonably prevent the member of the clergy or essential visitor from 3becoming infected by the resident.AB418,5,544. The resident has expressed that the resident does not wish to visit with the 5member of the clergy or essential visitor.AB418,5,96(c) If the federal centers for disease control and prevention or the federal 7centers for medicare and medicaid services issues guidance that is more restrictive 8in allowing visitation than par. (a), an assisted living facility or nursing home may 9comply with that guidance instead of complying with par. (a).AB418,5,1210(4) Complaints. An individual may file a complaint with the department 11against an assisted living facility or a nursing home for failure to comply with this 12section.AB418,5,1613(5) Immunity. A health care professional, assisted living facility, nursing 14home, or employee, agent, or contractor of an assisted living facility or nursing 15home is immune from any civil or criminal liability for any act or omission while 16allowing visitation pursuant to sub. (3) (a).AB418,217Section 2. 50.373 of the statutes is created to read:AB418,5,191850.373 Visitation by essential visitor or clergy during a 19communicable disease outbreak. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB418,5,2020(a) “Essential visitor” means any of the following:AB418,5,23211. An individual to visit and provide support to a patient in a hospital who is 22designated by the patient or the patient’s guardian or agent under an activated 23power of attorney for health care.AB418,6,212. The guardian of a patient in a hospital or the agent under an activated 2power of attorney for health care of a patient in a hospital.AB418,6,33(b) “Hospital” has the meaning given in s. 50.33 (2).AB418,6,44(c) “Member of the clergy” has the meaning given in s. 765.002 (1).AB418,6,75(2) Applicability. At any time a hospital limits visitors due to an outbreak or 6epidemic of a communicable disease in the community in which the hospital is 7located, the hospital shall conform its visitation policy to this section.AB418,6,98(3) Hospital visitation during a communicable disease outbreak. (a) A 9hospital shall allow the following visitations, except as provided in pars. (b) and (c):AB418,6,11101. At least one member of the clergy may visit a patient to pray with the 11patient or offer spiritual support for the patient in any of the following situations:AB418,6,1212a. The patient is nearing end of life.AB418,6,1413b. The patient is grieving the recent death of a friend or family member and 14has requested spiritual support.AB418,6,1615c. The patient is experiencing a life-threatening condition identified in the 16hospital’s visitation policy and has requested spiritual support.AB418,6,18172. At least one essential visitor may visit a patient in any of the following 18situations:AB418,6,1919a. The patient is nearing end of life.AB418,6,2020b. The patient is grieving the recent death of a friend or family member.AB418,7,221c. In the judgment of the attending health care professional, as defined in s. 22154.01 (1r), the benefits of the presence of the essential visitor outweighs the 1potential negative impacts that the essential visitor’s presence might have on other 2patients, visitors, and staff in the hospital.AB418,7,43(b) A hospital may deny visitation with a patient to a member of the clergy or 4an essential visitor if any of the following applies:AB418,7,851. The member of the clergy or essential visitor refuses to comply with any 6policies of the hospital that are in place to protect the health and safety of the 7member of the clergy or essential visitor, other visitors, patients, and staff in the 8hospital.AB418,7,1292. It is unknown if the member of the clergy or essential visitor is contagious 10with a communicable disease that poses a substantial risk to others and adequate 11precautions are not available to reasonably prevent the member of the clergy or 12essential visitor from infecting others at the hospital. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab418 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab418 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB418 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB418 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB418: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting